District of Columbia statutes.
47-318.06

Monitoring indications of economic growth.

[This is a test] Each year, in connection with budget estimates, the Chief Financial Officer shall prepare an analysis of change in the economy and in economic assumptions and revenue forecasts which, to the extent practical, shall comment on the impact of tax changes on expanding the District’s tax base. Such analysis shall be transmitted to the Council of the District of Columbia at the time of the Mayor’s budget submission to the Council.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2705(b), 46 DCR 6373